cs: Tkaninová konstrukce: Hybridní mykaná a česaná vlna; Bez vlasu; S usměrněným vlasem; Mykaná vlna; Česaná vlna; Jiná
zh-TW: 布料結構: 粗紡-精紡混紡; 無絨毛; 單向起絨; 粗紡; 精紡; 其他
bg-BG: Конструкция на плата: Хибридна вълна; Без мъх; Насочен мъх; Вълнен; Камгарен; Други
pt-PT: Composição do tecido: Híbrido de lã/lã penteada; Sem pelo; Pelo direcional; Tecido de lã; Lã penteada; Outra
nl: Stofconstructie: Hybride wol-kamgaren; Zonder vleug; Met vleugrichting; Wollen; Kamgaren; Overig
pt-BR: Construção do tecido: Híbrido de lã cardada e penteada; Sem felpa; Felpa direcional; Lã cardada; Lã penteada; Outras
tr: Çuha yapısı: Hibrit yünlü-kamgarn; Havsız; Yönlü havlı; Yünlü; Kamgarn; Diğer
sl-SI: Sestava tkanine: Hibridno - mikano/česano; Brez kosmičev; Usmerjeno kosmičeno; Mikano; Česano; Drugo
nb: Tøykonstruksjon: Hybrid av ull/kamgarn; Uten lo; Retningsbestemt lo; Ull; Kamgarn; Annet
da: Tøjkonstruktion: Hybrid uld/kamgarn; Uden luv; Retningsbestemt luv; Uld; Kamgarn; Andet
hr-HR: Izrada platna: Hibridno grebenano-češljano; Bez dlačica; Usmjerene dlačice; Grebenana vuna; Češljana vuna; Ostalo
lt-LT: Audinio konstrukcija: Hibridinis vilnonis-šukuotinis; Be pūkelių; Su kryptingu pūku; Vilnonis; Šukuotinis; Kita
fr: Fabrication en tissu: Hybride cardé-peigné; Ras; Gratté directionnel; Laine cardée; Laine peignée; Autre
el: Κατασκευή υφάσματος: Υβριδικό μάλλινο-πενιέ; Χωρίς πέλος; Με κατευθυντικό πέλος; Μάλλινο; Πενιέ; Άλλο
ru: Конструкция сукна: Гибридная суконно-камвольная; Без ворса; С направленным ворсом; Суконная; Камвольная; Другое
vi: Cấu trúc vải: Vải len chải thô-chải kỹ lai; Không có tuyết vải; Có tuyết vải theo hướng; Len chải thô; Len chải kỹ; Khác
sk-SK: Konštrukcia látky: Hybridná vlnená-česaná priadza; Bez vlasu; S usmerneným vlasom; Vlnená; Česaná vlna; Iné
ko: 원단 구조: 하이브리드 방모-소모; 무기모; 방향성 기모; 방모; 소모; 기타
th: โครงสร้างของผ้า: ไฮบริด Woolen-Worsted; ไม่มีขน; ขนเรียงตามทิศทาง; ผ้าวูล (Woolen); ผ้าวูล (Worsted); อื่นๆ
ja: クロス構造: ハイブリッド紡毛・梳毛; ナップフリー; 一方向起毛; 紡毛; 梳毛; その他
it: Costruzione del tessuto: Ibrido cardato-pettinato; Senza pelo; Con pelo direzionale; Cardato; Pettinato; Altro
es: Confección de la tela: Híbrido de lana cardada y peinada; Sin pelo; Perchado direccional; De lana cardada; De lana peinada; Otro
de: Stoffaufbau: Hybrid Streichgarn-Kammgarn; Ohne Flor; Gerichtet geraut; Streichgarn; Kammgarn; Andere
pl: Wykonanie ścierki: Hybrydowa (wełna zgrzebna i czesankowa); Bez meszku; Z okrywą włosową kierunkową; Wełniana (zgrzebna); Czesankowa; Inna
en: Cloth construction: Hybrid Woolen-Worsted; Nap-Free; Napped Directional; Woolen; Worsted; Other
ro-RO: Construcția țesăturii: Hibrid lână cardată/pieptănată; Fără puf; Cu puf direcțional; Lână cardată; Lână pieptănată; Altele
fi: Kankaan rakenne: Karsta- ja kampalangan hybridi; Nukkaamaton; Nukattu, suunnattu; Karstavilla; Kampavilla; Muu
hu: Szövet felépítése: Hibrid kártolt-fésült gyapjú; Bolyhosodásmentes; Bolyhosított (szálirányos); Kártolt gyapjú; Fésült gyapjú; Egyéb
zh-CN: 面料结构: 粗纺-精纺混纺; 无绒面; 顺毛绒面; 粗纺; 精纺; 其他
sv: Textilkonstruktion: Hybrid av kardgarn och kamgarn; Utan lugg; Riktad lugg; Kardgarn; Kamgarn; Övrigt